Utah statutes.
63B-1a-201.   Bonds proceeds -- Deposits -- Investment -- Disposition of
investment income and unexpended proceeds.
(1) (a)  The commission shall provide that proceeds from the sale of bonds
issued under this chapter are deposited within one or more accounts as
determined by the commission or by the state treasurer.
(b)  The state treasurer shall administer and maintain these accounts.
(2) (a)  The state treasurer shall:
(i)  establish the kinds of investments in which the proceeds of bonds issued
under this chapter may be invested; and
(ii)  designate where the income from the investment of bond proceeds shall be
applied.
(b)  The state treasurer shall apply the income from the investment of
proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter as directed by the commission by
resolution.
(3)  Upon completion of the purposes for which the bonds were issued, any
unexpended proceeds of the bonds issued under this chapter shall be deposited
in the related sinking fund unless the commission provides otherwise by
resolution.
